Wisconsin, session 2025, SB442.
do enact as follows:SB442,11Section 1. 50.36 (1r) of the statutes is created to read:SB442,2,2250.36 (1r) (a) In this subsection:SB442,2,431. “Operating room” means a room used for the performance of surgical 4procedures requiring one or more incisions.SB442,2,752. “Smoke evacuation system” means equipment that effectively captures and 6filters surgical smoke at the site of origin before the smoke makes contact with the 7eyes or the respiratory tract of occupants in the room.SB442,2,1083. “Surgical smoke” means the gaseous byproduct produced by energy-9generating devices including surgical plume, smoke plume, bio-aerosols, laser-10generated airborne contaminants, or lung-damaging dust.SB442,2,1511(b) Except as provided in par. (c), the department shall require hospitals and 12ambulatory surgical centers, as defined in 42 CFR 416.2, to adopt and implement 13policies to prevent exposure to surgical smoke in operating rooms by requiring the 14use of a smoke evacuation system in the operating room during any surgical 15procedure that is likely to generate surgical smoke.SB442,2,1916(c) Paragraph (b) does not apply if a health care provider who is engaging in a 17surgical procedure that is likely to generate surgical smoke concludes that using a 18smoke evacuation system in the operating room during the surgical procedure is not 19necessary or advisable under the circumstances.SB442,2,2020